ro_RO.aff
#********************************************************************************
# masculine (sm/L)
SFX L Y 69
SFX L   0     u-i      [^eu]
SFX L   0     u      [^eu]
SFX L   0     ul      [^eu]           s. m. sg. art.
SFX L   0     ului    [^eu]          s. m. sg. dat.
SFX L   0     ule    [^eu]
SFX L   0     i       [^deilnstu]    s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   0     ii      [^deilnstu]     s. m. pl. art.
SFX L   0     ilor    [^deilnstu]    s. m. pl. dat.
SFX L   0     i       [^a]n            s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   0     ii      [^a]n            s. m. pl. art.
SFX L   0     ilor    [^a]n           s. m. pl. dat.
SFX L   0     i       [^ei]an         s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   0     ii      [^ei]an         s. m. pl. art.
SFX L   0     ilor    [^ei]an         s. m. pl. dat.
SFX L   an    ni      ean           s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   an    nii     ean           s. m. pl. art.
SFX L   an    nilor   ean           s. m. pl. dat.
SFX L   an    eni     ian            s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   an    enii    ian             s. m. pl. art.
SFX L   an    enilor  ian            s. m. pl. dat.
SFX L   0     i       i                  s. m. pl. art.
SFX L   0     lor     i                 s. m. pl. dat.
SFX L   d     zi      d                s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   d     zii     d                s. m. pl. art.
SFX L   d     zilor   d               s. m. pl. dat.
SFX L   0     le      e                s. m. sg. art.
SFX L   0     lui     e                s. m. sg. dat.
SFX L   e     i      [^t]e                s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   e     ii      [^t]e                s. m. pl. art.
SFX L   e     ilor      [^t]e             s. m. pl. dat.
SFX L   te    ți      te                 s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   te    ții     te                 s. m. pl. art.
SFX L   te    ților   te                 s. m. pl. dat.
SFX L   s     și      s                  s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   s     șii     s                   s. m. pl. art.
SFX L   s     șilor   s                  s. m. pl. dat.
SFX L   0     l       u                  s. m. sg. art.
SFX L   0     lui     u                 s. m. sg. dat.
SFX L   0     le     u
SFX L   u     i       [^ri]u             s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   u     ii      [^ri]u             s. m. pl. art.
SFX L   u     ilor    [^ri]u            s. m. pl. dat.
SFX L   iu     iu-i       iu
SFX L   iu     ii       iu               s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   iu     iii      iu                s. m. pl. art.
SFX L   u     ilor    iu                 s. m. pl. dat.
SFX L   u     i       [^s].ru            s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   u     ii      [^s].ru            s. m. pl. art.
SFX L   u     ilor    [^s].ru           s. m. pl. dat.
SFX L   stru  ștri    stru              s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   stru  ștrii   stru              s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   stru  ștrilor stru              s. m. pl. dat.
SFX L   scru  scri    scru              s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   scru  scrii   scru              s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   scru  scrilor scru              s. m. pl. dat.
SFX L   l     i       el                   s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   l     ii      el                    s. m. pl. art.
SFX L   l     ilor    el                   s. m. pl. dat.
SFX L   0     i       [^e]l                s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   0     ii      [^e]l                s. m. pl. art.
SFX L   0     ilor    [^e]l                s. m. pl. dat.
SFX L   t     tu-i      [^s]t
SFX L   t     ți      [^s]t                  s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   t     ții     [^s]t                  s. m. pl. art.
SFX L   t     ților   [^s]t                 s. m. pl. dat.
SFX L   st    stu-i     st
SFX L   st    ști     st                    s. m. pl. neart.
SFX L   st    știi    st                    s. m. pl. art.
SFX L   st    știlor  st                   s. m. pl. dat.
#end*******************************************************************************

#********************************************************************************
# masculine (sm/l)
SFX l Y 13
SFX l   0     u-i      [^eu]
SFX l   0     u      [^eu]
SFX l   0     ul      [^eu]           s. m. sg. art.
SFX l   0     ului    [^eu]          s. m. sg. dat.
SFX l   0     ule    [^eu]
SFX l   0     le      e                s. m. sg. art.
SFX l   0     lui     e                s. m. sg. dat.
SFX l   0     l       u                  s. m. sg. art.
SFX l   0     lui     u                 s. m. sg. dat.
SFX l   0     le     u
SFX l   iu     iu-i       iu
SFX l   t     tu-i      [^s]t
SFX l   st    stu-i     st
#end*******************************************************************************

# Nume proprii
SFX U Y 3
SFX U a o a
SFX U a ei [^cgk]a
SFX U a ăi [cgk]a

# inlocuiri
REP 4
REP ce che
REP ci chi
REP ge ghe
REP gi ghi


# this is a addon for hunspell-utf8 only dictionaries
# it allows sugestions based on both cedilla and commabelow
# it also allows transliteration for î to â
MAP 8
MAP aăâî
MAP iîâ
MAP sşș
MAP tţț
MAP AĂÂÎ
MAP IÎÂ
MAP SŞȘ
MAP TŢȚ
