ro_RO.dic
Ada/U
Adania/U
Adelaida/U
Adina/U
Adriana/U
Afrodita/U
Agapia/U
Aglaia/U
Aida/U
Alberta/U
Alesia/U
Alexa/U
Alexia/U
Alicia/U
Alina/U
Ama/U
Amanda/U
Amedeia/U
Aminta/U
Ana/U
Analia/U
Anastasia/U
Anda/U
Andrada/U
Anemona/U
Angela/U
Anghelina/U
Anica/U
Aniela/U
Anita/U
Antanasia/U
Antonia/U
Arabela/U
Ariadna/U
Athena/U
Augusta/U
Aurora/U
Barbara/U
Belinda/U
Berta/U
Bianca/U
Bogdana/U
Briana/U
Briseida/U
Camelia/U
Carina/U
Carmela/U
Casandra/U
Caterina/U
Catrina/U
Celestina/U
Cenușăreasa/U
Cesonia/U
Chiara/U
Cipriana/U
Claudia/U
Cleopatra/U
Constantina/U
Corina/U
Cosmina/U
Crenguța/U
Cristiana/U
Crăița/U
Cătălina/U
Dafina/U
Dalia/U
Dalina/U
Dania/U
Daria/U
Denia/U
Denissa/U
Despina/U
Dida/U
Dochia/U
Dora/U
Drăguța/U
Dumitrița/U
Eda/U
Elena/U
Eliana/U
Eliza/U
Emanuela/U
Emiliana/U
Erica/U
Erinda/U
Eufrosina/U
Eva/U
Evelina/U
Fenicia/U
Filipa/U
Fiona/U
Floarea/U
Florența/U
Florica/U
Florinela/U
Fortuna/U
Francisca/U
Gavrila/U
Genoveva/U
Georgia/U
Georgina/U
Geza/U
Gianina/U
Gilda/U
Gina/U
Gloria/U
Greta/U
Helena/U
Hermiona/U
Hortensia/U
Iaridna/U
Iasmina/U
Ileana/U
Ilinca/U
Ina/U
Ioana/U
Iona/U
Ionița/U
Irina/U
Isabela/U
Iuliana/U
Iustina/U
Izabela/U
Jana/U
Jenica/U
Joana/U
Juana/U
Julieta/U
Karina/U
Katerina/U
Larisa/U
Laurenția/U
Leana/U
Lenuța/U
Letiția/U
Liana/U
Ligia/U
Lina/U
Lisa/U
Livia/U
Lizuca/U
Lorela/U
Loriana/U
Luca/U
Luciana/U
Luiza/U
Lăcrămioara/U
Magdalena/U
Malina/U
Mara/U
Marcia/U
Marghița/U
Mariana/U
Maricica/U
Marina/U
Mariuța/U
Marta/U
Matilda/U
Medana/U
Melinda/U
Melita/U
Mia/U
Micșunica/U
Mihaela/U
Miluca/U
Minodora/U
Mirabela/U
Mirela/U
Miruna/U
Momoka/U
Monica/U
Mădălina/U
Mărioara/U
Măriuța/U
Nana/U
Natalia/U
Nichita/U
Nicola/U
Nicula/U
Nina/U
Oana/U
Ofelia/U
Olimpia/U
Oliviana/U
Otilia/U
Pamela/U
Paraschiva/U
Paula/U
Petra/U
Querida/U
Rafaela/U
Rahela/U
Raisa/U
Ramona/U
Regina/U
Renata/U
Rica/U
Rodica/U
Romanița/U
Romina/U
Roza/U
Ruxandra/U
Sabrina/U
Samanta/U
Sanda/U
Sebastiana/U
Sidonia/U
Simina/U
Smara/U
Sofia/U
Sonia/U
Sorina/U
Stana/U
Stela/U
Sânziana/U
Tamara/U
Teodora/U
Tereza/U
Tiana/U
Trandafira/U
Tudorița/U
Ursula/U
Valeria/U
Vanda/U
Venera/U
Veronica/U
Victoria/U
Viorica/U
Voichița/U
Zaira/U
Zoica/U
achingiu/L
actanțial/L
adamic/L
aerian/L
afurisit/L
agrometeorolog/L
aguti/l
albuț/L
alchidal/l
algebric/L
aluminat/l
aluminosilicat/l
alveolar/L
alămi/l
amfineurian/L
aminobenzen/l
amoniac/l
anacruzic/L
anemofil/L
anizopetal/L
anticalofil/L
antigenic/L
antimetabolit/l
antineutrino/l
antipolonez/L
antivirus/L
apaș/L
april/l
arabizant/L
argentifer/L
arginti/l
arhitectural/L
arhon/l
aril/l
artizan/L
arval/l
arăriel/l
ascorbic/l
asmațuchi/l
asmățui/l
aster/L
atmosferic/L
aur/l
autofon/L
avrigean/L
babau/l
bacovian/L
bandajist/L
baribal/l
batal/L
bebi/l
beglerbei/L
belzebut/l
bengali/l
berber/L
biblioman/L
bilunar/L
bioluminescent/L
bisextil/L
boabab/L
bolard/L
bostangiu/L
brahial/L
branchipus/l
bromic/l
bronhial/L
brumar/l
brumărel/l
bucher/L
bucsău/l
bulbucel/l
bulgar/L
bumbac/l
bumbăcel/l
burjui/L
butiric/l
bâtlan/L
bănicer/L
bătrâniș/l
cabotin/L
calao/l
calapăr/l
calcicol/L
calciferol/l
calembec/l
caloian/l
calpuzan/L
canibalic/L
cappuccino/l
capsoman/L
carbamic/l
carceral/L
carâmb/L
catodic/L
caudillo/l
ceaprazar/L
centrifugal/L
cerut/L
chiloțel/L
chimen/l
chimion/l
chulo/l
cicatrizant/L
cicero/l
ciclohexan/l
ciclopentan/l
cimbrișor/l
cincantin/l
cinetist/L
cioroi/L
cirus/L
ciunt/L
climateric/L
coalescent/L
codobelc/L
colastru/l
coleric/L
colesterol/l
colărez/L
comital/L
conchiliolog/L
confortant/L
constant/L
contracurent/L
copai/l
copier/L
corai/l
corcoduș/L
cornet/L
cosițel/L
crai/L
crocant/L
crohmal/l
crom/l
cromal/l
cucușor/L
cumen/l
cunial/l
cupal/l
cupru/l
cuvântăreț/L
cârpaci/L
căprior/L
cărindar/l
dactiloscop/L
dandi/l
decalcifiant/L
deferențial/L
demagogic/L
dependent/L
desfăcut/L
deuteriu/l
dialectolog/L
diclormetan/l
dimetilbenzen/l
dinoteriu/L
discret/L
divinatori/L
dogal/L
draconic/L
drummer/l
drăguleț/L
duracid/L
echipolent/L
ecosez/l
efeb/L
electrod/L
elicoidal/L
emu/l
emul/L
enteral/L
episcop/L
ergocalciferol/l
eroic/L
etan/l
etern/L
eucaliptol/l
eufemic/L
excitant/L
extensor/L
extrareglementar/L
factotum/l
falaitar/L
fascinant/L
faurmaur/l
faustbal/l
fecral/l
fenic/l
fenobarital/l
fenolic/L
fer/l
fierbincior/L
financiar/L
fizionomic/L
florer/l
fluent/L
fluorhidric/l
folk/l
fondamental/L
fosfor/l
fosil/L
fototropic/L
fox/l
frenologic/L
frez/l
frățân/L
fucus/l
fulminic/l
fumaric/l
funicul/L
furan/l
furfural/l
furioso/l
furmint/l
fuzel/l
fântânar/L
galvanizator/L
gambir/l
gaucho/l
gecko/l
genealogic/L
geometru/L
gerar/l
germănar/l
gerovital/l
ghețar/L
ghimbir/l
ghirin/l
gigolo/l
gimnosofist/L
ginseng/l
glicerofosforic/l
glioxal/l
glomerular/L
golomăț/l
golănel/L
gordin/l
grandoman/L
grej/l
grimer/L
grizzly/l
grâuleț/l
guaiac/L
guanaco/l
gustar/l
găgăuz/L
hal/l
hamei/l
harag/L
heliu/l
hemerocal/l
henri/L
herțog/l
hesperornis/l
hexaclorciclohexan/l
hidalgo/l
hidrograf/L
hipogastric/L
hortiviticol/L
hurdler/l
hămei/l
ialomițean/L
iaprac/l
ihneumon/L
imprescriptibil/L
inconel/l
incorigibil/L
incub/l
infantil/L
intarsier/L
intertextual/L
irenolog/L
istov/l
jaloner/L
jneapăn/l
jurasic/L
kaki/l
kelvin/l
kilt/l
kripton/l
lactar/l
lamaism/l
lampant/l
landras/l
lapon/L
latir/l
lexicologic/L
lip/l
litologic/L
lunatec/L
lupin/l
macrosporange/L
mahdiu/l
malonic/l
mandril/L
mango/l
marțial/L
megaspor/L
metacrilic/l
metaforic/L
metafosforic/l
metanephros/l
metil/l
metilbenzen/l
metilen/l
metol/l
metoxibenzen/l
microagent/L
mikado/l
milimetric/L
mislete/l
mititeluț/L
mlecin/l
moldav/L
molibdenic/l
monobrombenzen/l
monoclorbenzen/l
monopetal/L
monșer/l
motopompist/L
mumifiant/L
musiu/l
mușețel/l
mânec/L
măcriș/l
măcrișor/l
mărar/l
mărăraș/l
măsălar/l
nacealnic/L
naht/l
nandu/l
nard/l
nauplius/l
necomplet/L
nelocuibil/L
netors/L
neutrino/l
nilgau/l
nitrobenzen/l
nocturn/L
nonius/l
nopal/l
năhut/l
năprasnic/L
năut/l
occipital/L
octal/l
odos/l
ogrădaș/L
onorar/L
oranj/l
orc/l
oregano/l
oriental/L
ortofosforic/l
otoman/L
paleograf/L
palux/l
panda/l
papuaș/L
parodic/L
parțiar/l
paznic/L
penicilic/l
penicillium/l
perceptibil/L
percloric/l
pescăruș/L
peso/l
picaro/l
picolo/l
picric/l
pigmentar/L
pir/l
piretru/l
pistrui/L
pisălău/l
pișălău/l
planorbis/l
plastru/l
plenison/L
plătibil/L
policrom/L
poliizopren/l
polivinilic/l
poliș/l
pomolog/L
popaz/l
portsatelit/l
porumbac/L
prahovean/L
prairial/l
premilitar/L
prier/l
principial/L
propilic/l
prostuleț/L
protos/l
prusic/l
pseudocilindru/L
pugilism/l
pulmon/L
pârș/L
păstru/l
quebracho/l
quetzal/l
racemic/L
razant/L
reglet/L
revent/l
revăzut/L
roș/L
rățoiaș/L
salvamont/l
scenarist/L
schinduf/l
selecțonist/L
sesam/l
sfârlac/L
simmenthal/l
snop/L
sodiu/l
spinotalamic/L
spinuleț/l
stomacal/L
subponderal/L
susan/l
svetnic/L
tanăt/l
tarhan/L
tembelizant/L
tenorino/l
teras/l
ternar/L
tetrahidrobenzen/l
tisular/L
tory/l
traficant/L
tricomonas/l
tricrom/L
tubiform/L
tungsten/l
tălpic/L
umeral/L
urm/L
vari/L
verif/l
vezicant/L
vinicer/l
virolog/L
vitrigon/l
voltamper/L
vărzar/L
zabet/l
zebu/l
zerovalent/L
zuluf/L
întunec/l
învăscut/L
Ștefana/U
șiret/L
știr/L
țif/l
țuicar/L
